Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2146.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 712.1(a), (c) and (e)(1) of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION to read:§ 712.1. Notification of agency business required and exceptions.(a) Official action.--Except as provided in subsection (b), [(c), (d) or (e)] (c) or , (d) OR (D.1) , an agency may not take official action on a matter of agency business at a meeting if the matter was not included in the notification required under section 709(c.1) (relating to public notice).* * *<--<--12345678910111213141516 (c) Business arising within 24 hours before meeting.--An agency may take official action on a matter of agency business that is not listed on a meeting agenda if the matter:(1) [the matter] arises or is brought to the attention of the agency within the 24-hour period prior to the meeting; and(2) [the matter] is de minimis in nature and does not involve the expenditure of funds or entering into a contract or agreement [by the agency].* * *(D.1) MINOR ADMINISTRATIVE APPROVALS.--(1) AN AGENCY MAY TAKE OFFICIAL ACTION ON A MINOR ADMINISTRATIVE APPROVAL NOT LISTED ON A MEETING AGENDA, INCLUDING A MINOR ADMINISTRATIVE APPROVAL INADVERTENTLY OMITTED FROM THE AGENDA, THAT WOULD CAUSE A HARDSHIP IF DELAYED UNTIL THE NEXT MEETING SUCH AS ITEMS DISCUSSED AND ACTED ON AT A PREVIOUS MEETING. THE EXCEPTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ONLY INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(I) PERSONNEL ACTIONS AFTER AN EXECUTIVE SESSION HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 708(A)(1) AND RESTRICTED TO FIRING, LEAVE, INVESTIGATIONS OR DISCIPLINING.(II) OFFICIAL ACTION, AFTER AN EXECUTIVE SESSION HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 708(A)(4), AUTHORIZING TIME-SENSITIVE LEGAL FILINGS OR OTHER ACTION RELATED TO LITIGATION BY THE SOLICITOR OR CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL OR OTHER PROFESSIONAL REPRESENTATIVES. THE OPINION RENDERED BY THE SOLICITOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) SHALL INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF WHY IMMEDIATE ACTION IS REQUIRED IN ORDER TO PRESERVE OR PROMOTE THE AGENCY'S LEGAL INTERESTS.(III) SMALL PURCHASING AND BILL APPROVALS OF LESS 20260HB2146PN2882 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THAN THE CURRENT TELEPHONIC BIDDING THRESHOLD ADVERTISED IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN FOR REPAIRING OR MITIGATING REAL OR POTENTIAL DAMAGE TO PROPERTY OF THE AGENCY.(IV) SMALL PURCHASING AND BILL APPROVALS OF LESS THAN THE CURRENT BIDDING THRESHOLD ADVERTISED IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN FOR PURCHASE OF PROPERTY AT AN AUCTION AND FACING AN IMMINENT DEADLINE.(V) GRANT APPLICATIONS SUBJECT TO AN IMMINENT DEADLINE.(VI) SMALL BORROWING OR TAX ANTICIPATION NOTE PAPERWORK UNDER 53 PA.C.S. PT. VII SUBPT. B (RELATING TO INDEBTEDNESS AND BORROWING) IF THE BORROWING OR NOTE WAS PREVIOUSLY APPROVED IN AN OPEN MEETING.(VII) MINOR PERMIT APPROVALS FOR SEWER MODULES. THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL NOT SUPERSEDE ANY REQUIREMENTS OF THE ACT OF JULY 31, 1968 (P.L.805, NO.247), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA MUNICIPALITIES PLANNING CODE.(2) PRIOR TO TAKING ACTION ON AN ITEM UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE AGENCY SHALL OBTAIN AN OPINION FROM ITS SOLICITOR OR CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL, AS THE CASE MAY BE, ON WHETHER THE PROPOSED OFFICIAL ACTION FALLS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION. THE OPINION SHALL BE PROVIDED BY THE SOLICITOR OR CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL AT THE MEETING OR IN WRITING PRIOR TO THE MEETING AND SHALL BE PUBLICLY DISCLOSED AT THE MEETING.(e) Changes to agenda.--(1) Upon majority vote of the individuals present and voting during the conduct of a meeting, an agency may add a matter of agency business arising under subsection (b), (c) or , (d) OR (D.1) to the agenda. The reasons for the changes to the agenda shall be announced at the meeting before any 20260HB2146PN2882 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vote is conducted to make the changes to the agenda. The agency may subsequently take official action on the matter added to the agenda. The agency shall post the amended agenda on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website, if available, and at the agency's principal office location no later than the first business day following the meeting at which the agenda was changed.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2146PN2882 - 4 - 123456789